Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB881.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 5324(a), 5335(b) and 8922 of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 5324. Assistance to tribunals and litigants outside this Commonwealth with respect to service.(a) General rule.--[A](1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), a court of record of this Commonwealth may order service upon any person who is domiciled or can be found within this Commonwealth of any document issued in connection with a matter in a tribunal 12345678910111213141516171819202122 outside this Commonwealth. The order may be made upon application of any interested person or in response to a letter rogatory issued by a tribunal outside this Commonwealth and shall direct the manner of service.(2) A court o f record of this Commonwealth shall have no authority under this section to order service upon any person for any matter in a tribunal outside of this Commonwealth involving the provision or delivery of reproductive health care services.(3) As used in this subsection, the term "reproductive health care services" means medical, surgical, counseling or referral services relating to the human reproductive system, including services relating to pregnancy, contraception or the termination of a pregnancy that may be lawfully performed in this Commonwealth, that are provided in any hospital, outpatient clinic, physician's office or other medical facility or office.* * *§ 5335. Issuance of subpoena.* * *(b) Duty of prothonotary.--[A](1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), a prothonotary in receipt of a foreign subpoena shall, in accordance with that court's procedure, promptly issue a subpoena for service upon the person to whom the foreign subpoena is directed.(2) A prothonotary shall have no authority under this section to issue a subpoena for service upon any person for any matter in a tribunal outside of this Commonwealth involving the provision or delivery of reproductive health 20250SB0881PN0993 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 care services.(3) As used in this subsection, the term "reproductive health care services" means medical, surgical, counseling or referral services relating to the human reproductive system, including services relating to pregnancy, contraception or the termination of a pregnancy that may be lawfully performed in this Commonwealth, that are provided in any hospital, outpatient clinic, physician's office or other medical facility or office.* * *§ 8922. Authority of officers of another state to arrest in this Commonwealth.[Any] (a) Authority.--Except as provided under subsection (b), any peace officer of another state who enters this Commonwealth in close pursuit of a person, and continues within this Commonwealth in such close pursuit, in order to arrest him, shall have the same authority to arrest and hold in custody such person on the ground that he has committed a crime in such state which is an indictable offense in this Commonwealth as peace officers of this Commonwealth have to arrest and hold in custody a person on the ground that he has committed a crime in this Commonwealth.(b) Exception.--A peace officer of another state under subsection (a) shall have no authority to arrest and hold in custody a person accused of a crime in such state involving reproductive health care services.(c) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "reproductive health care services" means medical, surgical, counseling or referral services relating to the human reproductive system, including services relating to pregnancy, 20250SB0881PN0993 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contraception or the termination of a pregnancy that may be lawfully performed in this Commonwealth, that are provided in any hospital, outpatient clinic, physician's office or other medical facility or office.Section 2. Section 9122 of Title 42 is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 9122. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * * "Reproductive health care services." Medical, surgical, counseling or referral services relating to the human reproductive system, including services relating to pregnancy, contraception or the termination of a pregnancy that may be lawfully performed in this Commonwealth, that are provided in any hospital, outpatient clinic, physician's office or other medical facility or office.* * *Section 3. Sections 9123 and 9146.1 of Title 42 are amended to read:§ 9123. Duty of Governor with respect to fugitives from justice.[Subject] (a) Duty.--Except as provided under subsection (b) and subject to the provisions of this subchapter, the provisions of the Constitution of the United States controlling, and any and all acts of Congress enacted in pursuance thereof, it is the duty of the Governor of this Commonwealth to have arrested and delivered up to the executive authority of any other state of the United States any person charged in that state with treason, 20250SB0881PN0993 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 felony or other crime, who has fled from justice and is found in this Commonwealth.(b) Exception.--The Governor shall have no authority to have arrested and delivered up to the executive authority of any other state of the United States any person charged in that state with treason, felony or other crime, who has fled from justice and is found in this Commonwealth for a criminal offense of another state involving the provision or delivery of reproductive health care services that would be lawful under the laws of this Commonwealth.§ 9146.1. Presigned waiver of extradition.(a) Delivery.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law and except as provided under subsection (b), a law enforcement agency in this Commonwealth holding a person who is alleged to have broken the terms of his probation, parole, bail or any other release in the demanding state shall immediately deliver that person to the duly authorized agent of the demanding state without the requirement of a Governor's warrant if all of the following apply:(1) The person has signed a prior waiver of extradition as a term of his current probation, parole, bail or other release in the demanding state.(2) The law enforcement agency holding the person has received an authenticated copy of the prior waiver of extradition signed by the person and photographs or fingerprints or other evidence properly identifying the person as the person who signed the waiver.(3) All open criminal charges in this Commonwealth have been disposed of through trial and sentencing.(b) Exception.--A law enforcement agency in this 20250SB0881PN0993 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth holding a person who is alleged to have broken the terms of the person's probation, parole, bail or any other release in the demanding state for an offense involving the provision or delivery of reproductive health care services that would be lawful under the laws of this Commonwealth shall have no authority to deliver that person to the duly authorized agent of the demanding state without the requirement of a Governor's warrant.Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0881PN0993 - 6 - 123456789